src/morphology/incoming/verb_middle_affixes.lexc
LEXICON Filter-Transitives

! Only provide paths out of this lexicon for transitive forms whose
! subject-object combinations are semantically plausible.

! No 1SG > 1SG ("I saw me") or 1SG > 1PL ("I saw us").
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@    Filter-Ditransitives;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@    Filter-Ditransitives;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@    Filter-Ditransitives;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@    Filter-Ditransitives;

! No 2SG > 2SG ("you saw you") or 2SG > 2PL ("you saw you guys").
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@    Filter-Ditransitives;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@    Filter-Ditransitives;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@    Filter-Ditransitives;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@    Filter-Ditransitives;

! No 1PL > 1SG ("we saw me") or 1PL > 1PL ("we saw us").
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@    Filter-Ditransitives;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@    Filter-Ditransitives;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@    Filter-Ditransitives;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@    Filter-Ditransitives;

! No 2PL > 2SG ("you guys saw you") or 2PL > 2PL ("you guys saw you guys").
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@    Filter-Ditransitives;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@    Filter-Ditransitives;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@    Filter-Ditransitives;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@    Filter-Ditransitives;

! All 3SG/3PL/4 forms are fine, since combinations of subjects and direct
! objects in these persons that have special morphological realizations
! are handled elsewhere above.
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@                                         Filter-Ditransitives;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@                                         Filter-Ditransitives;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@                                         Filter-Ditransitives;

! All reflexive and reciprocal forms are fine.
@U.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@                                                           Filter-Ditransitives;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@                                                          Filter-Ditransitives;


LEXICON Filter-Ditransitives

@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@                                                          #;
@U.VALENCE.DITRANSITIVE@                                                        Filter-Subject-Oblique;


LEXICON Filter-Subject-Oblique

! Only provide paths out of this lexicon for ditransitive forms
! whose subject-oblique object combinations are semantically
! plausible.

! No 1SG > 1SG ("I saw me") or 1SG > 1PL ("I saw us").
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.2@    Filter-Direct-Oblique;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@    Filter-Direct-Oblique;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.2@    Filter-Direct-Oblique;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@    Filter-Direct-Oblique;

! No 2SG > 2SG ("you saw you") or 2SG > 2PL ("you saw you guys").
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.1@    Filter-Direct-Oblique;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@    Filter-Direct-Oblique;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.1@    Filter-Direct-Oblique;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@    Filter-Direct-Oblique;

! No 1PL > 1SG ("we saw me") or 1PL > 1PL ("we saw us").
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.2@    Filter-Direct-Oblique;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@    Filter-Direct-Oblique;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.2@    Filter-Direct-Oblique;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@    Filter-Direct-Oblique;

! No 2PL > 2SG ("you guys saw you") or 2PL > 2PL ("you guys saw you guys").
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.1@    Filter-Direct-Oblique;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@    Filter-Direct-Oblique;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.1@    Filter-Direct-Oblique;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@    Filter-Direct-Oblique;

! All 3SG/3PL/4 forms are fine, since combinations of subjects and direct
! objects in these persons that have special morphological realizations
! are handled elsewhere above.
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@                                           Filter-Direct-Oblique;
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@                                           Filter-Direct-Oblique;
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.4@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@                                           Filter-Direct-Oblique;

! All reflexive and reciprocal forms are fine at this point (we'll handle them more below).
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.REFL@                                                            Filter-Direct-Oblique;
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.RECIP@                                                           Filter-Direct-Oblique;


LEXICON Filter-Direct-Oblique

! Only provide paths out of this lexicon for ditransitive forms
! whose direct object-oblique object combinations are semantically
! plausible.

! No DOBJ.1SG > IOBJ.1SG ("gave me to me") or DOBJ.1SG > IOBJ.1PL ("gave me to us").
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.2@    #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@    #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.4@    #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.2@    #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@    #;

! No DOBJ.2SG > IOBJ.2SG ("gave you to you") or DOBJ.2SG > IOBJ.2PL ("gave you to you guys").
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.1@    #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@    #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.4@    #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.1@    #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@    #;

! No DOBJ.1PL > IOBJ.1SG ("gave us to me") or DOBJ.1PL > IOBJ.1PL ("gave us to us").
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.2@    #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@    #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.4@    #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.2@    #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@    #;

! No DOBJ.2PL > IOBJ.2SG ("gave you guys to you") or DOBJ.2PL > IOBJ.2PL ("gave you guys to you guys").
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.1@    #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@    #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.4@    #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.1@    #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@    #;

! All 3SG/3PL/4 forms are fine, since combinations of subjects and direct
! objects in these persons that have special morphological realizations
! are handled elsewhere above.
@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@                                         #;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@                                         #;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.4@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@                                         #;

! Make sure that at most one reflexive or reciprocal form appears as a
! direct object or indirect object (i.e., no DObj.REFL/RECIP-IObj.REFL/RECIP
! combinations)
@U.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.1@                                      #;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.2@                                      #;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@                                      #;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.4@                                      #;
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.REFL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@                                      #;
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.REFL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@                                      #;
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.REFL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@                                      #;
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.REFL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.4@                                      #;

@U.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.1@                                     #;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.2@                                     #;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@                                     #;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.4@                                     #;
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.RECIP@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@                                     #;
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.RECIP@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@                                     #;
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.RECIP@@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@                                     #;
@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.RECIP@@U.OBJECTPERSON.4@                                     #;

! TODO: 'They fed themselves to each other'? (REFL-RECIP)
! TODO: 'They fed each other to themselves'? (RECIP-REFL)
